Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.115

Eastern Washington cultural landscape feature account.

(1) The Washington state eastern Washington cultural landscape feature account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the establishment and maintenance of the cultural landscape feature. The department of enterprise services may solicit and accept moneys from gifts, grants, or endowments for this purpose. All receipts from federal funds, gifts, or grants from the private sector, foundations, or other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the design, siting, permitting, construction, maintenance, dedication, or creation of educational materials related to placement of this cultural landscape feature on the capitol campus. Only the department of enterprise services, or the department of enterprise services' designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The department of enterprise services may adopt rules governing the receipt and use of funds in the account.

[ 2023 c 302 s 2.]